Utah statutes.
32A-13-101.   Utah Code of Criminal Procedure applicable.
Except as otherwise provided in this title, the procedure in all criminal
cases arising under this title shall be as prescribed in Title 77, Utah Code
of Criminal Procedure, and any other rules adopted by the Utah Supreme Court.
